punjabi_lexc.lexc
! Simple Gurmukhi(Punjabi) inflectional morphological model

Multichar_Symbols
! Word-classes
+N
+V
+Adj
+Adv
+Pron
+Postp
+Conj
+Punct

! Common/Proper noun inflection
+Sg
+Pl
+Masc
+Fem
+Dir
+Obl
+Voc
+Abl
+Loc
+Poss
+Prop
+Ext
+UnExt

! Verb inflection
+Inf
+Imp
+Pres
+Cop
+Past
+PresCont !Present continous
+Pcp1
+Pcp2
+1Sg
+2Sg
+3Sg
+Non3Sg
! Special verb classes
+Aux

! Pronoun features
+Art
+Dem
+Prox
+Dir
+Erg
+Dat
+Abl
+Gen
+3Pl


! Adverb features
+Interr

! Special features
+Neg

! Beginning of Punjabi morphology

LEXICON Root
NounStems ;
VerbStems ;
AdjectiveStems ;
AdverbStems ;
Pronouns ;
Postpositions ;
Conjunctions ;
Punctuation ;
ProperNameStems ;

!Punjabi nouns distinguishes two genders, two numbers, and five cases of direct, oblique, vocative, ablative, and locative/instrumental.
LEXICON NounStems
RegularNouns ;

LEXICON RegularNouns
devkahāṇī ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
gāḷ ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
gallā̃ ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
grauh ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
khojh ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
khojhā ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
kraupā̃ ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
mār ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
jangḷa ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
parikahāṇīiā̃ ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
pihlī ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
samaā ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
sabh ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
tājrbē ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
vēlē ExtendedNounSuffixes ;
ādiwāsī UnExtendedNounSuffixes ; 
bāsā UnExtendedNounSuffixes ; 
kahaāṇaī UnExtendedNounSuffixes ; 
kītē UnExtendedNounSuffixes ; 
gap UnExtendedNounSuffixes ; 
laai UnExtendedNounSuffixes ; 
mnukh UnExtendedNounSuffixes ;
purāṇā UnExtendedNounSuffixes ;
wadaā UnExtendedNounSuffixes ; 
puraṇa UnExtendedNounSuffixes ; 
vele UnExtendedNounSuffixes ;
vḍevḍeriā̃ UnExtendedNounSuffixes ; 
yug UnExtendedNounSuffixes ; 

LEXICON ExtendedNounSuffixes
+N+Masc+Sg+Dir+Ext:%>ā # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Obl+Ext:%>e # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Voc+Ext:%>ā # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Abl+Ext:%>iȭ # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Loc+Ext:%>e # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Dir+Ext:%>e # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Obl+Ext:%>iā̃ # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Voc+Ext:%>iō # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Dir+Ext:%>ī # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Obl+Ext:%>ī # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Loc+Ext:%>īē # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Loc+Ext:%>īā̃ # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Loc+Ext:%>īō # ;

LEXICON UnExtendedNounSuffixes
+N+Masc+Sg+Voc+UnExt:%>ā # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Abl+UnExt:%>ȭ # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Loc+UnExt:%>ē # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Obl+UnExt:%>ā̃ # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Voc+UnExt:%>ō # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Loc+UnExt:%>ī̃ # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Voc+UnExt:%>ē # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Abl+UnExt:%>ȭ # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Loc+UnExt:%>ē # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Dir+UnExt:%>ā̃ # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Voc+UnExt:%>ō # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Loc+UnExt:%>ī̃ # ;


LEXICON ProperNameStems
aadi+N+Sg:aadi # ;
arth+N+Sg:arth # ;
bare+N+Sg:bare # ;
bumika+N+Sg:bumika # ;
bumika+N+Pl:bumikawa # ;
itahās+N+Sg/Pl:itahās # ;
itahās+N+Sg/Pl+Past:itahāsik # ;
haṛ+N+Sg+Past:haṛ # ;
kise+N+Sg/Pl:kise # ;
kodrat+N+Sg/Pl:kodrat # ;
naā+N+Sg/Pl:naā # ;
nadiā+N+Sg/Pl:nadiā # ;
jaā+N+Sg/Pl:jaā # ;
jīwn+N+Sg:jīwn # ;
jivan+N+Sg:jīvan # ;
jwāḷamakhī+N+Sg/Pl:jwāḷamakhī # ;
laukasaāhaita+N+Sg/Pl:laukasaāhaita # ;
site+N+Sg/Pl:site # ;
rab+N+Sg/Pl:rab # ;
devidevtē+N+Sg/Pl:devidevtē # ;
kaaḷ+N+Sg/Pl: kaaḷ # ;
anubhav+N+Sg/Pl:anubhav # ;
pidhīdarpidhī+N+Sg/Pl:pidhīdarpidhī # ;
jivandhang+N+Sg/Pl:jivandhang # ;
ràgr+N+Sg/Pl:ràgr # ;
rūp+N+Sg/Pl:rūp # ;
shūrū+N+Sg:shūrū # ;
shikār+N+Sg:shikār # ;
wihmā+N+Sg:wihmā # ;
vḍevḍeriā+N+Pl:vḍevḍeriā # ;
yugā+N+Pl:yugā # ;

LEXICON VerbStems
aphadh VerbSuffixes ;
aunde VerbSuffixes ;
aundē VerbSuffixes ;
dūjae VerbSuffixes ;
hauī VerbSuffixes ;
jaāndi VerbSuffixes ;
likhī VerbSuffixes ;
likhtī VerbSuffixes ;
labhan VerbSuffixes ;
laga VerbSuffixes ;
krda VerbSuffixes ;
gāḷ VerbSuffixes ;    
mār VerbSuffixes ;
push VerbSuffixes ;
ràgr VerbSuffixes ;
suṇaī VerbSuffixes ;	
samaā VerbSuffixes ;
shurū VerbSuffixes ;
site VerbSuffixes ;
sirj VerbSuffixes ;
samajhdā VerbSuffixes ;
sojhi VerbSuffixes ;
tak VerbSuffixes ;
wadaā VerbSuffixes ;

LEXICON VerbSuffixes 
+V+1Sg+Pres:%>na # ;
+V+1Pl+Pres:%>iyan # ; 
+V+1Sg+Pcp1:%>yat # ;

LEXICON VerbCopulas    !In Punjabi, there are two copulas: "he" for present tense and "sī" for past tense.
ā+V+Pres+Cop:ā # ; 
bārē+V+Cop:bārē # ; 
dā̃+V+1Sg+Pres+Cop:dā̃ # ;
dē+V+1Pl+Pres+Cop:dē # ;
dsiā+V+Cop:dsiā # ;
dsna+V+Cop:dsna # ;
haai+V+1Sg+Pres+Cop:haai # ;
hā̃+V+1Sg+Pres+Cop:hā̃ # ;
hē̃+V+2Sg+Pres+Cop:hē̃ # ;
hē+V+3Sg+Pres+Cop:hē # ; 
hā̃+V+1Pl+Pres+Cop:hā̃ # ;
hō+V+2Pl+Pres+Cop:hō # ;
han+V+3Pl+Pres+Cop:han # ;
haai+V+Cop:haai # ;
haungē+V+Cop:haungē # ;
hauṇā+V+Cop:hauṇā # ;
hoyea+V+Cop:hoyea # ;
jo+V+Cop:jo # ;
jhā̃+V+Cop:jhā̃ # ;
jaā+V+Cop:jaā # ;
ih+V+Cop:ih # ;
ik+V+Cop:ik # ;
is+V+Cop:is # ;
laai+V+Cop:laai # ;
liā+V+Cop:liā # ;
lgda+V+Cop:lgda # ;
kathawā̃+V+Cop:kathawā̃ # ;
kītā+V+Cop:kītā # ;
nū̃+V+Cop:nū̃ # ;
rahī+V+Cop:rahī # ;
sā̃+V+1Sg+Past+Cop:sā̃ # ;
sē̃+V+2Sg+Past+Cop:sē̃ # ;
sī+V+3Sg+Past+Cop:sī # ;
sā̃+V+1Pl+Past+Cop:sā̃ # ;
sō+V+2Pl+Past+Cop:sō # ;
san+V+3Pl+Past+Cop:san # ;
saṛde+V+Cop:saṛde # ;
site+V+Cop:site # ;
sme+V+Cop:sme # ;
phatdē+V+Cop:phatdē # ;
pushanā+V+Cop:pushanā # ;
vi+V+Cop:vi # ;

LEXICON AdjectiveStems
!Inflecting Adjectives
āpnē AdjectiveSuffixes ;
baṛaā AdjectiveSuffixes ;
bahaut AdjectiveSuffixes ;
chaliyan AdjectiveSuffixes ;
dsiā AdjectiveSuffixes ;
kītē AdjectiveSuffixes ;
laai AdjectiveSuffixes ;
laga AdjectiveSuffixes ;
liā AdjectiveSuffixes ;
likhtī AdjectiveSuffixes ;
nvvi AdjectiveSuffixes ;
nwiyiā̃ AdjectiveSuffixes ;
sabh AdjectiveSuffixes ;
sarrē AdjectiveSuffixes ;
sadde AdjectiveSuffixes ;
sanū AdjectiveSuffixes ;
sirj AdjectiveSuffixes ;
smjhan AdjectiveSuffixes ;
puraṇe AdjectiveSuffixes ;
rahaī AdjectiveSuffixes ;
wadaā AdjectiveSuffixes ;

!Non-Inflecting Adjectives
arth+Adj:arth # ;
hovēgā+Adj:hovēgā # ;
fajhūl+Adj:fajhūl # ;
is+Adj:is # ;
ih+Adj:ih # ;
ik+Adj:ik # ;
jo+Adj:jo # ;
kauī+Adj:kauī # ;
kē+Adj:kē # ;
kise+Adj:kise # ;
kīsē+Adj:kīsē # ;
lyē+Adj:lyē # ;
nē+Adj:nē # ;
nū̃+Adj:nū̃ # ;
smajik+Adj:smajik # ;
pta+Adj:pta # ;
rūp+Adj:rūp # ;
os+Adj:os # ;
us+Adj:us # ;
ū̃s+Adj:ū̃s # ;
vēlē+Adj:vēlē # ;
wjon+Adj:wjon # ;

LEXICON AdjectiveSuffixes
+Adj+Masc+Sg+Dec+Dir:%> ā # ;
+Adj+Masc+Sg+Dec+Obl:%> ē # ;
+Adj+Masc+Sg+Dec+Voc:%> iā # ;	
+Adj+Masc+Sg+Dec+Abl:%> iȭ # ;
+Adj+Masc+Sg+Dec+Loc:%> ē # ;
+Adj+Masc+Pl+Dec+Dir:%> ē # ;
+Adj+Masc+Pl+Dec+Obl:%> iā̃ # ;
+Adj+Masc+Pl+Dec+Voc:%> iō # ;

+Adj+Fem+Sg+Dec+Dir/Obl:%> ī # ;
+Adj+Fem+Sg+Dec+Voc:%> īē # ;
+Adj+Fem+Pl+Dec+Dir/Obl:%> īā̃ # ;
+Adj+Fem+Pl+Dec+Voc:%> īō # ;

LEXICON AdverbStems
! Inflecting adverbs
baṛaā AdverbSuffixes ;
bārē AdverbSuffixes ;
bahaut AdverbSuffixes ;
chukkī AdverbSuffixes ;
rahi AdverbSuffixes ;
shūrū AdverbSuffixes ;
vich AdverbSuffixes ;
! Non-inflecting adverbs
aadi+Adv:aadi # ;
ajjē+Adv:ajjē # ;
bārē+Adv:bārē # ;
bārrē+Adv:bārrē # ;
hun+Adv:hun # ;
is+Adv:is # ;
ih+Adv:ih # ;
jaā̃+Adv:jaā̃ # ;
jadauȭ+Adv:jadauȭ # ;
ke+Adv:ke # ;
kauī+Adv:kauī # ;
haṛ+Adv:haṛ # ;
mithihasīk+Adv:mithihasīk # ;
nē+Adv:nē # ;
naā+Adv:naā # ;
nhi+Adv:nhi # ;
sagȭ+Adv:sagȭ # ;
shaāid+Adv:shaāid # ;
site+Adv:site # ;
pahailau+Adv:pahailau # ;
pr+Adv:pr # ;
tā̃+Adv:tā̃ # ;
tak+Adv:tak # ;
udȭ+Adv:udȭ # ;
vadhū+Adv:vadhū # ;
vich+Adv:vich # ;
vichȭ+Adv:vichȭ # ;

LEXICON AdverbSuffixes
+Adv+1Pl:%>iyan # ;
+Adv+Past:%>yat # ;

LEXICON Pronouns
! Personal pronouns
!Pronouns do not distinguish gender
mẽ+Pron+Pers+1Sg:mẽ # ;
asī̃+Pron+Pers+Pl:asī̃ # ;
tū̃+Pron+Pers+2Sg:tū̃ # ;
tusī̃+Pron+Pers+2Pl:tusī̃ # ;

āpnē+Pron+Pers+Dat+2Pl:āpnē # ;
menū̃+Pron+Pers+Dat+1Sg:menū̃ # ;
sānū̃+Pron+Pers+Dat+1Pl:sānū̃ # ;
tenū̃+Pron+Pers+Dat+2Sg:tenū̃ # ;
tuā́nū̃+Pron+Pers+Dat+2Pl:tuā́nū̃ # ;

methȭ+Pron+Pers+Abl+1Sg:methȭ # ;
sāthȭ+Pron+Pers+Abl+1Sg:sāthȭ # ;
tethȭ+Pron+Pers+Abl+2Pl:tethȭ # ;
tuā́thȭ+Pron+Pers+Abl+2Pl:tuā́thȭ # ;

mērā+Pron+Pers+Gen+1Sg: mērā # ;
sāḍā+Pron+Pers+Gen+1Pl: sāḍā # ;
sadde+Pron+Pers+Gen+2Pl: sadde # ;
tērā+Pron+Pers+Gen+2Sg: tērā # ;
tuā́dā+Pron+Pers+Gen+2Pl: tuā́dā # ;

ḗ+Pron+Pers+Obj+1Sg+Neu:ḗ # ;    
ḗnā̃+Pron+Pers+Obj+1Sg+Neu:ḗnā̃ # ; 
ṓ+Pron+Pers+Dir+3Pl+Neu:ṓ # ;  ! Multiple ambiguity
ṓ+Pron+Pers+Dir+3Sg+Neu:ṓ # ;  ! Multiple ambiguity
ṓ+Pron+Pers+Obj+3Pl+Neu:ṓ # ;   ! Multiple ambiguity
ṓnā̃+Pron+Pers+Obj+3Pl:ṓnā̃ # ; 
kauī+Pron+Pers+Dir+Interr+Pl+Neu:koṇ # ;
koṇ+Pron+Pers+Dir+Interr+Sg+Neu:koṇ # ;
kī+Pron+Pers+Obj+Interr+Sg+Neu:kī # ;

!Derivative Pronouns
kadȭ+Pron+Pers+time+Interr:kadȭ # ;
jadȭ+Pron+Pers+time+Rel:jadȭ # ;
huṇ+Pron+Pers+time+Dem:huṇ # ;
ōdȭ+Pron+Pers+time+Dem:ōdȭ # ;

kitthē+Pron+Pers+place+Interr:kitthē # ;
jitthē+Pron+Pers+place+Rel:jitthē # ;
ēthē+Pron+Pers+place+Dem:ēthē # ;
ōthē+Pron+Pers+place+Dem:ōthē # ;

kivē̃+Pron+Pers+manner+Interr:kivē̃ # ;
jivē̃+Pron+Pers+manner+Rel:jivē̃ # ;
ivē̃+Pron+Pers+manner+Dem:ivē̃ # ;
uvē̃+Pron+Pers+manner+Dem:uvē̃ # ;

kinnā+Pron+Pers+quantity+Interr:kinnā # ;
jinnā+Pron+Pers+quantity+Rel:jinnā # ;
innā+Pron+Pers+quantity+Dem:innā # ;
unnā+Pron+Pers+quantity+Dem:unnā # ;

kiḍḍā+Pron+Pers+size+Interr:kiḍḍā # ;
jiḍḍā+Pron+Pers+size+Rel:jiḍḍā # ;
eḍā+Pron+Pers+size+Dem:eḍā # ;
oḍā+Pron+Pers+size+Dem:oḍā # ;

LEXICON Postpositions
bārē+Postp:bārē # ;
binā̃+Postp:binā̃ # ;
dā+Postp:dā # ;
dē+Postp:dē # ;
duāḷē+Postp:duāḷē # ;
gabbē+Postp:gabbē # ;
kōḷ+Postp:kōḷ # ;
lāgē+Postp:lāgē # ;
laī+Postp:laī # ;
lyi+Postp:lyi # ;
nāḷ+Postp:nāḷ # ;
nē+Postp:nē # ;
nēṛē+Postp:nēṛē # ;
nū̃+Postp:nū̃ # ;
uttē+Postp:uttē # ;
vall+Postp:vall # ;
vikhē+Postp:vikhē # ;
takk+Postp:takk # ;
tȭ+Postp:tȭ # ;
tā+Postp:tā # ;
tē+Postp:tē # ;
vargā+Postp:vargā # ;
vi+Postp:vi # ;
vich+Postp:vich # ;
vickār+Postp:vickār # ;
vichon+Postp:vichon # ;

LEXICON Conjunctions
ki+Conj:ki # ;
vi+COnj:vi # ;
kyu+Conj:kyu # ;
jaduȭ+Conj:jaduȭ # ;
pr+Conj:pr # ;
tā̃+Conj:tā̃ # ;
tē+Conj:tē # ;
tȭ+Conj:tȭ # ;

LEXICON Punctuation
%|+Punct:%| # ;
%,+Punct:%, # ;
%:+Punct:%: # ;
%]+Punct:%] # ;
%[+Punct:%[ # ;
%"+Punct:%" # ;
%;+Punct:%; # ;
